nb: Kontrabass-pickupsystem: Hybrid (piezo og mikrofon); Magnetisk; Mikrofon (ekstern/klips); Mikrofon (intern); Ingen (kun akustisk); Piezo (bromontert); Piezo (under foten); Piezo (vinge/brojusterer); Annet
fr: Système de micro de la contrebasse: Hybride (piézo + micro); Magnétique; Micro (externe/à pince); Micro (interne); Aucun (acoustique uniquement); Piézo (monté sur chevalet); Piézo (sous le pied); Piézo (ailette/molette de chevalet); Autre
ru: Система звукоснимателя контрабаса: Гибридный (пьезо + микрофон); Магнитный; Микрофон (внешний / на клипсе); Микрофон (внутренний); Нет (только акустика); Пьезодатчик (на бридже); Пьезодатчик (под ножкой); Пьезодатчик (в крыле / регуляторе бриджа); Другое
pt-PT: Sistema de captação do contrabaixo vertical: Híbrido (piezo + microfone); Magnético; Microfone (externo/de mola); Microfone (interno); Nenhum (apenas acústico); Piezo (montado na ponte); Piezo (sob o pé); Piezo (asa/ajustador de ponte); Outro
da: Pickupsystem for kontrabas: Hybrid (piezo + mikrofon); Magnetisk; Mikrofon (ekstern/clip-on); Mikrofon (intern); Ingen (kun akustisk); Piezo (monteret på stol); Piezo (under fod); Piezo (vinge/stoljustering); Andet
cs: Systém snímání kontrabasu: Hybridní (piezo a mikrofon); Magnetický; Mikrofon (externí/připínací); Mikrofon (interní); Žádný (pouze akustický); Piezo (montáž na kobylku); Piezo (pod nožkou); Piezo (křidélko / nastavovač kobylky); Ostatní
ko: 업라이트 베이스 픽업 시스템: 하이브리드(피에조 + 마이크); 마그네틱; 마이크(외부/클립형); 마이크(내장형); 없음(어쿠스틱 전용); 피에조(브릿지 장착형); 피에조(언더 풋); 피에조(윙/브릿지 어저스터); 기타
ro-RO: Sistemul de doze al contrabasului: Hibrid (piezo + microfon); Magnetic; Microfon (extern/prindere cu clemă); Microfon (intern); Fără (doar acustic); Piezo (montat pe căluș); Piezo (sub picior); Piezo (aripă/ajustor de căluș); Altele
sl-SI: Sistem odjemnika zvoka za kontrabas: Hibridni (piezo in mikrofon); Magnetni; Mikrofon (zunanji/na priponko); Mikrofon (notranji); Brez (samo akustični); Piezo (na kobilici); Piezo (pod nogo); Piezo (na krilcu/nastavku kobilice); Drugo
tr: Kontrbas manyetik sistemi: Hibrit (piezo ve mikrofon); Manyetik; Mikrofon (harici/klipsli); Mikrofon (dahili); Yok (yalnızca akustik); Piezo (köprüye monte); Piezo (ayak altı); Piezo (kanat/köprü ayarlayıcı); Diğer
bg-BG: Система за адаптер на контрабас: Хибридна (пиезо + микрофон); Магнитна; Микрофон (външен/с щипка); Микрофон (вътрешен); Няма (само акустично); Пиезо (монтирана на магарето); Пиезо (под крачето); Пиезо (в крилото/регулатора на магарето); Друга
hu: Nagybőgő átvételi rendszer: Hibrid (piezo + mikrofon); Mágneses; Mikrofon (külső/csíptetős); Mikrofon (belső); Nincs (csak akusztikus); Piezo (húrlábra szerelt); Piezo (talp alatti); Piezo (szárny/húrláb állító); Egyéb
ja: アップライトベースピックアップシステム: ハイブリッド (ピエゾ + マイク); マグネティック; マイク (外部/クリップオン); マイク (内蔵); なし (アコースティックのみ); ピエゾ (ブリッジマウント); ピエゾ (アンダーフット); ピエゾ (ウィング / ブリッジアジャスター); その他
th: ระบบการรับเสียงเบสแบบตรง: ไฮบริด (เปียโซ + ไมค์); แม่เหล็ก; ไมโครโฟน (ภายนอก/แบบหนีบ); ไมโครโฟน (ภายใน); ไม่มี (โปร่งเท่านั้น); เปียโซ (ติดกับบริดจ์); เปียโซ (ใต้ขาบริดจ์); เปียโซ (ปีก/ตัวปรับบริดจ์); อื่นๆ
es: Sistema de micrófonos del contrabajo: Híbrido (piezoeléctrico + micrófono); Magnético; Micrófono (externo/de pinza); Micrófono (interno); Ninguno (solo acústico); Piezoeléctrico (montaje en puente); Piezoeléctrico (bajo el pie); Piezoeléctrico (ala/ajustador del puente); Otro
fi: Kontrabasson mikrofonijärjestelmä: Hybridi (pietso + mikrofoni); Magneettinen; Mikrofoni (ulkoinen/klipsi); Mikrofoni (sisäinen); Ei mitään (vain akustinen); Pietso (tallaan kiinnitettävä); Pietso (tallanjalan alle); Pietso (siipi/tallansäädin); Muu
vi: Hệ thống lấy hàng âm trầm thẳng đứng: Hybrid (piezo + mic); Từ tính; Micrô (gắn ngoài/kẹp); Micrô (bên trong); Không có (chỉ acoustic); Piezo (gắn trên ngựa đàn); Piezo (dưới chân ngựa đàn); Piezo (cánh ngựa đàn/bộ điều chỉnh ngựa đàn); Khác
lt-LT: Viršutinė bosinės gitaros ėmiklių sistema: Hibridinis (pjezo + mikrofonas); Magnetinis; Mikrofonas (išorinis / prisegamas); Mikrofonas (vidinis); Nėra (tik akustinis); Pjezoelektrinis (tvirtinamas prie tiltelio); Pjezoelektrinis (tvirtinamas po kojele); Pjezoelektrinis (sparnelio / tiltelio reguliatorius); Kita
de: Tonabnehmersystem des Kontrabasses: Hybrid (Piezo + Mikro); Magnetisch; Mikrofon (extern/Clip-on); Mikrofon (intern); Keine (nur akustisch); Piezo (am Steg montiert); Piezo (unter dem Fuß); Piezo (Flügel-/Stegversteller); Andere
it: Sistema di pickup del contrabbasso: Ibrido (piezo + microfono); Magnetico; Microfono (esterno/a clip); Microfono (interno); Nessuno (solo acustico); Piezo (montato sul ponte); Piezo (sotto il piedino); Piezo (aletta/regolatore ponte); Altro
zh-TW: 低音提琴拾音器系統: 混合型 (壓電式 + 麥克風); 磁力式; 麥克風 (外接/夾式); 麥克風 (內建); 無 (純原聲); 壓電式 (琴橋安裝); 壓電式 (琴橋腳下); 壓電式 (側翼 / 琴橋調節器); 其他
el: Σύστημα μαγνήτη κοντραμπάσου: Υβριδικό (piezo + μικρόφωνο); Μαγνητικό; Μικρόφωνο (εξωτερικό/clip-on); Μικρόφωνο (εσωτερικό); Κανένα (μόνο ακουστικό); Piezo (στη γέφυρα); Piezo (κάτω από το πόδι); Piezo (φτερό/ρυθμιστής γέφυρας); Άλλο
sk-SK: Systém snímačov pre kontrabas: Hybridný (piezo + mikrofón); Magnetický; Mikrofón (externý/pripínací); Mikrofón (interný); Žiadny (iba akustický); Piezo (na kobylku); Piezo (pod pätkou); Piezo (do krídelka/nastavovača kobylky); Iný
hr-HR: Uspravni sustav za preuzimanje basa: Hibridni (piezo i mikrofon); Magnetski; Mikrofon (vanjski / na kopču); Mikrofon (unutarnji); Nema (samo akustično); Piezo (na mostu); Piezo (ispod noge); Piezo (na krilu / podešivaču mosta); Ostalo
sv: Pickupsystem för kontrabas: Hybrid (piezo + mikrofon); Magnetisk; Mikrofon (extern/clip-on); Mikrofon (intern); Ingen (endast akustisk); Piezo (stallmonterad); Piezo (under foten); Piezo (vinge/stalljusterare); Övrigt
pl: System przetwornika kontrabasu: Hybrydowy (piezo + mikrofon); Magnetyczny; Mikrofon (zewnętrzny / na klipsie); Mikrofon (wewnętrzny); Brak (tylko akustyczny); Piezo (montowany na mostku); Piezo (pod nóżką); Piezo (skrzydełko / śruba mostka); Inne
pt-BR: Contrabaixo acústico sistema de captador: Híbrido (piezo + microfone); Magnético; Microfone (externo/de clipe); Microfone (interno); Nenhum (apenas acústico); Piezo (montado no cavalete); Piezo (sob o pé); Piezo (asa/ajustador do cavalete); Outro
nl: Contrabas pickupsysteem: Hybride (piëzo + microfoon); Magnetisch; Microfoon (extern/clip-on); Microfoon (intern); Geen (alleen akoestisch); Piëzo (op brug gemonteerd); Piëzo (onder de voet); Piëzo (vleugel/brugversteller); Anders
zh-CN: 立式低音提琴拾音系统: 混合型（压电 + 麦克风）; 磁性; 麦克风（外置/夹式）; 麦克风（内置）; 无（仅原声）; 压电式（安装在琴桥上）; 压电式（琴脚下方）; 压电式（侧翼/琴桥调节器）; 其他
en: Upright bass pickup system: Hybrid (piezo + mic); Magnetic; Microphone (external/clip-on); Microphone (internal); None (acoustic only); Piezo (bridge-mounted); Piezo (under-foot); Piezo (wing/bridge adjuster); Other